Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1910
Inspection of products; when completed.

No inspection of products placed in any container at any official establishment shall be deemed to be complete until the products are sealed or enclosed therein under the supervision of an inspector.

Laws 1969, c. 499, § 10, p. 1516.